Montana, session 2025, HB725.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 13-38-201, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-38-201. Election or appointment of committee representatives at primary -- vacancies -- tie
votes. (1) Each political party shall appoint or elect at each primary election one person of each sex, as defined
in 1-1-201, to serve as committee representatives for each election precinct. The committee representatives
must be residents and registered voters of the precinct. An individual may not be appointed or elected to serve
as a committee representative for more than one political party during the same 2-year term.
(2) If a political party chooses to appoint precinct committee representatives, the political party
shall make the appointments as provided in the party's rules.
(3) If a political party chooses to elect precinct committee representatives, the party may:
(a) administer the election itself as provided in the party's rules; or
(b) elect precinct committee representatives in a primary election, subject to 13-10-209 and
subsection (4) of this section.
(4) In a primary election for a precinct committee representative:
(a) if the number of candidates nominated for a party's precinct committee representatives is less
than or equal to the number of positions to be elected, the election administrator may give notice that a party's
precinct committee election will not be held in that precinct;
(b) if a party precinct committee election is not held pursuant to subsection (4)(a), the election
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 725
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 725
administrator shall declare elected by acclamation the candidate who filed for the position or who filed a
declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate. The election administrator shall issue a certificate of election to
the designated party.
(c) write-in votes for a precinct committee representative may be counted as specified in 13-15-
206(5) only if the individual whose name is written in has filed a declaration of intent as a write-in candidate by
the deadline prescribed in 13-10-211(1);
(d) in the case of a tie vote for a precinct committee representative position, the county central
committee shall determine a winner.
(5) Pursuant to 13-38-101, a vacancy in a precinct committee representative position must be filled
by the party governing body as provided in its rules."
Section 2. Saving clause. [This act] does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that
were incurred, or proceedings that were begun before [the effective date of this act].
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 725
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 725, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 725
INTRODUCED BY L. SCHUBERT
AN ACT GENERALLY REVISING THE APPOINTMENT OR ELECTION OF COMMITTEE REPRESENTATIVES;
PROVIDING THAT AN INDIVIDUAL MAY NOT BE APPOINTED OR ELECTED TO SERVE AS A COMMITTEE
REPRESENTATIVE FOR MORE THAN ONE POLITICAL PARTY IN THE SAME TERM; AND AMENDING
SECTION 13-38-201, MCA.”